Maryland, session 2026, HB0936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–148.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CERTIFIED CHESAPEAKE INVASIVE SPECIES PROVIDER” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–701 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE.
– 1 –

Ch. 805 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) “CERTIFIED LOCAL FARM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–701
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(C) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY
PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL:
(1) IDENTIFY THE DOLLAR AMOUNTS OF FOOD PROCURED FOR
SCHOOL MEALS IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR FROM CERTIFIED LOCAL FARMS
AND CERTIFIED CHESAPEAKE INVASIVE SPECIES PROVIDERS; AND
(2) PUBLISH THAT DATA ON THE SCHOOL SYSTEM’S WEBSITE.
(D) (1) THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL SET
TARGET INCREASES FOR THE DOLLAR AMOUNT OF FOOD PROCURED FROM
CERTIFIED LOCAL FARMS AND CERTIFIED CHESAPEAKE INVASIVE SPECIES
PROVIDERS FOR THE 2028–2029, 2030–2031, 2031–2032, 2033–2034, AND
2036–2037 SCHOOL YEARS USING THE DATA IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION AS A BASELINE.
(2) THE SCHOOL SYSTEM, IN COORDINATION WITH THE OFFICE OF
FOOD SYSTEMS RESILIENCE AND PUBLIC INPUT, SHALL ESTABLISH A PLAN TO
MEET THE TARGET INCREASES ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Certified Chesapeake invasive species” means a finfish species that is:
(1) ranked as high priority in the Maryland Aquatic Nuisance Species
Management Plan; and
(2) harvested from the Chesapeake Bay or its tributaries.
(c) “Certified Chesapeake invasive species provider” means a person licensed and
authorized as a seafood dealer under § 4–701 of the Natural Resources Article that:
(1) is certified by the Department in accordance with regulations adopted
under this subtitle; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 805
(2) can demonstrate that the person’s product is a certified Chesapeake
invasive species.
(d) “Certified local farm” means a local farm enterprise that:
(1) meets the nutrient management requirements established under Title
8, Subtitle 8 of the Agriculture Article; and
(2) is certified by the Department in accordance with regulations adopted
under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –